Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 550 of Title 3, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Aircraft” has the same meaning as that provided in Section
252 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except that the aircraft
shall have a gross weight of nine thousand (9,000) pounds or less
and operate under the provisions of 14 C.F.R., Part 91; and
2. “Automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast” means an
advanced aviation surveillance technology that combines ground
infrastructure, aircraft avionics, and an aircraft’s positioning
source to create an accurate surveillance interface between an
aircraft and air traffic control. The term consists of two
different services:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1950 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. ADS-B, which receives data provided by ADS-B Out, as
well as weather and traffic information from ground
stations, and
b. ADS-B Out, which broadcasts an aircraft’s Global
Positioning System location, altitude, ground speed,
and other data.
B. No government entity or private individual or entity shall
use information broadcasted or collected by an automatic dependent
surveillance-broadcast system as a means for calculating,
generating, and collecting fees from owners or operators who operate
aircraft within this state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
March 2, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1950 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)